Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 COLORADO PUBLIC ASSISTANCE ACT
26-2-113. Funds for old age pensions.

The state old age pension fund and the moneys allocated thereto pursuant to the provisions of article XXIV of the state constitution shall include amounts received from the incorporation fees and inheritance taxes imposed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

In addition to all other fees, charges, and impositions now fixed by law, there shall be assessed and collected, by the governmental department, person, or party in charge under whose jurisdiction the present collection is now required by law, the following fees, charges, sums, and impositions, which fees, charges, sums, and impositions shall be set aside, allocated, and allotted to the old age pension fund:

Ten percent additional amount of the fees which are due and paid to the secretary of state upon incorporation of any corporation or association for profit; and

Ten percent additional upon the amount of any tax payable under the provisions of the inheritance tax laws of this state.

In computing the amount of the additional tax or fee as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the nearest multiple to five cents shall be taken in all cases.

Any and all of such funds collected by any state official or state department pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be paid over by such official or department to the state treasurer, who on the first day of each month shall divide and pay the same into each of the county old age pension accounts of the county social services funds in this state on the pro rata basis which the population of the respective county has to the population of the entire state according to the last official United States census.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1187, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-13.

26-2-114. Amount of assistance payments - old age pension.

The basic minimum award payable to those persons qualified to receive an old age pension shall be one hundred dollars monthly; but the state board may adjust the said basic minimum award above one hundred dollars if, in its discretion, living costs have changed sufficiently to justify such adjustment.

and (a.5) Repealed.

The amount of net income from whatever source, either in cash or in kind, which any person qualified for an old age pension may receive shall be deducted from the amount of monthly pension which such person would otherwise receive. The rules and regulations of the state department may require an applicant or recipient who may be eligible for benefits under another federal or state program or who may have a right to receive or recover other income or resources to take reasonable steps to apply for, otherwise pursue, and accept such benefits, income, or resources.

In computing said net income, the county department shall not consider the ownership of real estate occupied as a residence by the recipient as income. In addition, in computing said net income, the county department shall not consider as income funds received by or on behalf of the recipient from the federal government for rent supplementation or relocation payments or income earned by the recipient up to the maximum extent allowed by Title I, section 2, of the social security act.

Whenever the United States congress shall provide by law for a retroactive increase in monthly benefits under the old age, survivors, and disability provisions of the social security act, or for a retroactive increase in monthly benefits under the railroad retirement act, and the amount of such retroactive increase in monthly benefits shall be subsequently paid to an old age pension recipient in a lump sum, then the amount of such lump sum payment shall not be considered as income and shall not be deducted from the amount of monthly pension otherwise payable to such recipient for the month in which such lump sum payment is received.

Any special payment by the federal government in the form of a one-time-only credit against or refund of federal income taxes shall not be considered as income for purposes of this title unless required by federal law.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1188, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-14.

L. 75:

(2)(b)(I) amended, p. 889, § 7, effective July 28.

L. 77:

(2)(b)(IV) added, p. 1346, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 78:

(2)(a) R&RE, p. 436, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 79:

(2)(a.5) added, p. 1439, § 24, effective July 3.

L. 83:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1130, § 6, effective June 3; (2)(a.5) amended, p. 2101, § 17, effective October 13.

L. 87:

(2)(a.5) repealed, p. 1159, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1857, § 16, effective April 11; (2)(a) amended, p. 1897, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(2)(a) amended, p. 81, § 2, effective October 16.

L. 93:

(2)(a)(II)(B) repealed, p. 333, § 2, effective April 12; (2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 1147, § 87, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1561, § 9, effective July 1; (2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 2625, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1994, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(II)(A) repealed, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1302, § 1, effective January 1, 2011.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2)(a) by Senate Bill 91-105 and House Bill 91-1287 were harmonized. Amendments to subsection (2)(a) by House Bill 94-1029 and Senate Bill 94-133 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(II)(A), see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993; for the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(II)(A), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-2-115. State old age pension fund - priority.

All moneys deposited in the state old age pension fund shall be first available for payment of basic minimum awards to qualified old age pension recipients, and no part of said fund shall be transferred to any other fund until such basic minimum awards shall have been paid. Moneys in the state old age pension fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1188, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-15.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1507, § 6, effective June 6.

26-2-116. Old age pension stabilization fund.

Any moneys remaining in the old age pension fund after full payment of basic minimum awards to qualified old age pension recipients shall be transferred to a fund to be known as the old age pension stabilization fund, which fund shall be maintained at the amount of five million dollars and restored to that amount after any disbursements therefrom. The state board shall use the moneys in such fund only to stabilize payments of old age pension basic minimum awards. Moneys in the old age pension stabilization fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1188, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-16.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1507, § 7, effective June 6.

26-2-117. Old age pension health and medical care fund - supplemental old age pension health and medical care fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1188, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-17.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1507, § 8, effective June 6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 912, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2586, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 1994, § 23, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning the old age pension health and medical care fund and the supplemental old age pension health and medical care fund, see § 25.5-2-101.

26-2-118. Amount of assistance payments - aid to families with dependent children. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1189, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-18.

L. 77:

(3) added, p. 1346, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1233, § 20, effective July 1.

26-2-119. Amount of assistance payments - aid to the needy disabled - rules.

The amount of assistance payments that shall be granted to a recipient under the program for aid to the needy disabled shall be on the basis of budgetary need, as determined by the county department with due regard to any income, property, or other resources available to the recipient, within available appropriations, and in accordance with rules of the state department.

The rules of the state department:

Shall establish the assistance payment under the program for aid to the needy disabled, which assistance payment for the 2014-15 state fiscal year must not be less than the amount of the assistance payment for the 2013-14 state fiscal year increased by eight percent. For state fiscal years 2015-16 through 2018-19, and in fiscal years thereafter if necessary, subject to available appropriations, the state department is encouraged to increase the amount of the assistance payment to restore the payment to the state fiscal year 2006-07 amount and to adjust the assistance payment to reflect increases in the cost of living.

May require an applicant or recipient who may be eligible for benefits under another federal or state program or who may have a right to receive or recover other income or resources to take reasonable steps to apply for, otherwise pursue, and accept such benefits, income, or resources.

(1.5) and (2) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1302, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.)

(3)

(4) Repealed.

(5) Any special payment by the federal government in the form of a one-time-only credit against or refund of federal income taxes shall not be considered as income for purposes of this title unless required by federal law.

(6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1189, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-19.

L. 75:

(1) amended, (3) and (4) repealed, and (5) added, pp. 890, 893, §§ 8, 14, 9, effective July 28.

L. 77:

(5) R&RE, p. 1346, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1.5) added, p. 82, § 3, effective October 16.

L. 93:

(1.5)(a)(II)(B) repealed, p. 333, § 3, effective April 12; (1.5)(a)(I) and (1.5)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 1147, § 88, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(1.5) amended, p. 1561, § 10, effective July 1; (1.5)(a)(I) and (1.5)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 2625, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1.5) amended, p. 2017, § 98, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1), (1.5), and (2) amended, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1302, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2014:

(1) amended and (6) added, (SB 14-012), ch. 248, p. 959, § 3, effective August 6.

26-2-119.5. Health and medical care program - aid to the needy disabled. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 700, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 204, § 23, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 1994, § 23, effective July 1.

26-2-119.7. Federal disability benefits - application assistance - fund - rules - report - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Federal disability benefits, including supplemental security income and social security disability insurance, help Coloradans with the most significant disabilities achieve stability by providing income for necessities, including housing;

The state aid to the needy disabled program provides two hundred seventeen dollars per month to individuals who cannot work due to a severe disability while the individuals are applying for federal disability benefits. With only two hundred seventeen dollars per month in income, aid to the needy disabled program participants struggle to meet their most basic needs. As a consequence, these participants are often homeless, in crisis, and unable to engage in sickness prevention or health maintenance activities, resulting in high-cost emergency room visits or other high-cost medical treatment.

Completing the application process for federal disability benefits is onerous. The application is complex and requires applicants to compile past medical records from medical providers. Applicants must also navigate the process while contending with debilitating mental and physical health conditions, and, for aid to the needy disabled program participants, the additional barrier of extreme poverty.

Despite the extreme need for federal disability benefits, applicants who are ultimately determined to be eligible for federal disability benefits are often denied multiple times;

Delayed access to federal disability benefits often creates or prolongs homelessness or puts individuals at risk of homelessness. Fifty-seven percent of Colorado's chronically homeless population are persons with disabilities.

Delayed access to federal disability benefits puts Coloradans with disabilities at increased risk of health crisis. Nationally, in federal fiscal year 2016, over ten thousand people died waiting to be approved for federal disability benefits.

Assistance in applying for federal disability benefits significantly improves the rate of approval of initial applications and therefore reduces the time it takes for individuals to access federal disability benefits; and

Timely access to federal disability benefits improves the stability, health, and well-being of persons living with disabilities; reduces state spending on homeless services, preventable emergency health care, and other public programs; and boosts the state and local economies by providing federally funded support that recipients spend in Colorado cities and counties to meet their basic needs.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is necessary to help persons applying for or receiving aid to the needy disabled benefits in navigating the application process for federal disability benefits.

The state department shall administer a program that may be implemented by county departments that helps individuals with disabilities navigate the application process for federal disability benefits. The program must assist individuals who are applying for or receiving aid to the needy disabled benefits pursuant to section 26-2-119. A county department may choose whether to participate in the program created in this section.

The state department shall allocate money appropriated pursuant to this section from the disability benefits application assistance fund, created in subsection (6) of this section, to participating county departments pursuant to state department rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section.

The assistance provided pursuant to the program may include:

Referrals to appropriate medical providers and other professionals whose assessments are required as part of an application for federal disability benefits;

Outreach to applicants to provide reminders and track progress on application requirements;

Assistance with compiling and drafting supporting documentation for an application for federal disability benefits;

Assistance with completing and submitting an application for federal disability benefits; and

Assistance appealing denials of federal disability benefits.

After receiving input from counties, a statewide association of county commissioners, and other relevant stakeholders, the state department shall promulgate rules establishing an allocation formula for money appropriated to the state department for purposes of this section. In establishing the allocation formula, the state department shall consider the number of aid to the needy disabled program participants in each participating county and the need to ensure that money appropriated for the program is available in every region of the state in which there are participating counties.

Repealed.

Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a county department allocated money pursuant to this section shall use the money to provide services to aid to the needy disabled program participants in the county or region. In implementing the program, a county department is permitted to collaborate with other counties or to contract with nonprofit organizations. Persons providing assistance to individuals with disabilities pursuant to this section shall have demonstrated expertise or receive adequate training in the federal disability benefits application process.

The state department shall evaluate the program one year after its implementation, and every five years thereafter, to determine if the program is meeting the goals of the program, including but not limited to:

Assisting federal disability benefit applicants in submitting timely and complete applications;

Increasing the percentage of eligible applicants awarded federal disability benefits;

Reducing the average time to qualify for federal disability benefits; and

Reducing the length of time that individuals with disabilities participate in the aid to the needy disabled program.

The state department shall submit the program evaluation required pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), reporting on the program evaluation pursuant to this section shall continue so long as the program is being evaluated.

The disability benefits application assistance fund, referred to in this subsection (6) as the "fund", is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money deposited in the fund in accordance with subsection (6)(b) of this section.

Any money appropriated from the general fund to the state department for grants for the aid to the needy disabled program that is unexpended and unencumbered as of the close of the applicable fiscal year reverts to the general fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department shall expend money from the fund for the purposes described in this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1223), ch. 389, p. 3457, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(6)(b) amended and (7)(b) repealed, (HB 20-1388), ch. 124, p. 522, § 1, effective June 24.

L. 2021:

(7)(a) repealed, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2803, § 25, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3)(b), effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 3459.)

26-2-120. Amount of assistance payments - aid to the blind.

The amount of assistance payments that shall be granted to a recipient under the program for aid to the blind shall be on the basis of budgetary need, as determined by the county department with due regard to any income, property, or other resources available to the recipient, within available appropriations, and in accordance with rules of the state department. The rules of the state department may require an applicant or recipient who may be eligible for benefits under another federal or state program or who may have a right to receive or recover other income or resources to take reasonable steps to apply for, otherwise pursue, and accept such benefits, income, or resources.

(1.5) and (2) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1303, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.)

(3) Repealed.

(4) Every recipient of aid to the blind shall submit to a reexamination as to his eyesight at least once every three years, unless excused therefrom by the state department, and at other times when required to do so by the county department or the state department. He shall furnish any medical information required by the county department or the state department.

(5) Repealed.

(6) Any special payment by the federal government in the form of a one-time-only credit against or refund of federal income taxes shall not be considered as income for purposes of this title unless required by federal law.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1190, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-20.

L. 75:

(1) amended, (3) and (5) repealed, and (6) added, pp. 890, 893, 891, §§ 10, 14, 11, effective July 28.

L. 77:

(6) R&RE, p. 1347, § 4, effective May 26.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1.5) added, p. 82, § 4, effective October 16.

L. 93:

(1.5)(a)(II)(B) repealed, p. 333, § 4, effective April 12.

L. 94:

(1.5) amended, p. 1561, § 11, effective July 1; (1.5)(a)(I) amended, p. 2704, § 262, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1.5) amended, p. 2017, § 99, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1), (1.5), and (2) amended, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1303, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1.5) by House Bill 94-1029 and Senate Bill 94-133 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1.5)(a)(I), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-2-121. Expenses of treatment to prevent blindness or restore eyesight.

Temporary assistance may be granted by the county department to any applicant for aid to the blind or additional assistance granted to any recipient of aid to the blind who is in need of treatment either to prevent blindness or to restore his eyesight, whether or not he is blind as defined by section 26-2-103 (3) and the rules and regulations of the state department, if he is otherwise qualified for aid to the blind under this article. The temporary assistance may include necessary traveling expenses and other expenses to receive treatment from a hospital or clinic designated by the state department. Such payment shall be allowed and paid in the same manner as aid to the blind provided by this article and shall be subject to reimbursement by the state in the same manner as such aid to the blind.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1190, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-21.

26-2-122. Public assistance in the form of social services.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department may provide those services required by the social security act and applicable federal regulations. Subject to available appropriations, the state department may, by regulation, elect to provide those services which are optional under the social security act.

Eligible persons shall include those required to be eligible for services by the social security act and federal regulations. Subject to available appropriations, eligible persons may include those persons who are optionally eligible under federal law and regulations whom the state department, by regulation, includes as eligible persons.

The state department shall adopt budgetary standards from which a graduated schedule of fees shall be determined. Said fees shall be paid by persons who receive social services and who have the financial ability to pay in accordance with the schedule of fees established by the state department.

The state department shall prepare and submit to the secretary of the federal department of health and human services a state plan for services that meets the requirements of the social security act, federal regulations, and this section. The state department shall administer the program for services in accordance with the social security act, federal regulations, and this section.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1191, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-22.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 899, § 2, effective June 26.

L. 97:

(4) amended, p. 1233, § 21, effective July 1.

26-2-122.3. Home care allowance - repeal.

The state department, subject to available appropriations, may provide adult foster care for persons eligible to receive old age pension, aid to the needy disabled, or aid to the blind. For purposes of this paragraph (a), "adult foster care" means care and services that, in addition to room and board, may include, but are not limited to, personal services, recreational opportunities, transportation, utilization of volunteer services, and special diets. Such care and services are provided to recipients of federal supplemental security income benefits who are also eligible for the Colorado supplement program for aid to the needy disabled or aid to the blind and who do not require skilled nursing care or intermediate health care and cannot remain in or return to their residences but who need to reside in a supervised nonmedical setting on a twenty-four-hour basis. Those persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities as defined in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S., or who are receiving or are eligible to receive services pursuant to article 10 of title 25.5, C.R.S., or any provision of title 27, C.R.S., do not qualify for adult foster care under this paragraph (a).
(1) (a) (I) The state department, subject to available appropriations, may provide adult foster care for persons eligible to receive old age pension, aid to the needy disabled, or aid to the blind. For purposes of this paragraph (a), "adult foster care" means care and services that, in addition to room and board, may include, but are not limited to, personal services, recreational opportunities, transportation, utilization of volunteer services, and special diets. Such care and services are provided to recipients of federal supplemental security income benefits who are also eligible for the Colorado supplement program for aid to the needy disabled or aid to the blind and who do not require skilled nursing care or intermediate health care and cannot remain in or return to their residences but who need to reside in a supervised nonmedical setting on a twenty-four-hour basis. Those persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities as defined in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S., or who are receiving or are eligible to receive services pursuant to article 10 of title 25.5, C.R.S., or any provision of title 27, C.R.S., do not qualify for adult foster care under this paragraph (a).

Adult foster care facilities shall be licensed by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-27-105, C.R.S.

This subsection (1)(a) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), the state department, subject to available appropriations, may provide home care allowance for persons who meet the functional impairment and financial eligibility criteria as established by the state department by rule and:

Were receiving old age pension benefits and home care allowance on the day prior to January 1, 2014, and remain continuously eligible for such benefits; or

Are receiving aid to the needy disabled, aid to the blind, or supplemental social security income benefits.

Persons eligible to receive home- and community-based services pursuant to article 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S., shall not be eligible for home care allowance under this paragraph (b).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b)(III) is effective until July 1, 2024.] For the purposes of this paragraph (b), "home care allowance" is a program that provides payments, subject to available appropriations, to functionally impaired persons who meet the criteria specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) as determined in accordance with rules. The payments allow recipients who are in need of long-term care to purchase community-based services as defined in rules adopted by the state department. These services may include, but need not be limited to, the supervision of self-administered medications, assistance with activities of daily living as defined in section 25.5-6-104 (2)(a), C.R.S., and assistance with instrumental activities of daily living as defined in section 25.5-6-104 (2)(g), C.R.S. The rules adopted by the state department shall specify, in accordance with the provisions of this section, the services available under the program and shall specify eligibility criteria for the home care allowance program. In addition, the rules shall specifically provide for a determination as to the person's functional impairment and the person's unmet need for paid care and shall address amounts awarded to persons eligible for home care allowance. The state department shall specify in the rules the methods for determining the unmet need for paid care and the amount of a home care allowance that may be awarded to eligible persons. Such methods may be based on how often a person experiences unmet need for paid care or any other method that the state board determines is valid in correlating unmet need for paid care with an amount of a home care allowance award. The state department shall require that eligibility and unmet need for paid care be determined through the use of a comprehensive and uniform client assessment instrument prescribed by the state department. The state department may adjust income eligibility criteria, including any functional impairment standard, or the amounts awarded to eligible persons or may limit or suspend enrollments as necessary to manage the home care allowance program within the funds appropriated by the general assembly. In addition, the state department may adjust which services are available under the program; except that the adjustment shall be consistent with the provisions of this subsection (1).

(III)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b)(III) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

For the purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "home care allowance" is a program that provides payments, subject to available appropriations, to functionally impaired persons who meet the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section as determined in accordance with rules. The payments allow recipients who are in need of long-term services and supports to purchase community-based services as defined in rules adopted by the state department. These services may include, but need not be limited to, the supervision of self-administered medications, assistance with activities of daily living, and assistance with instrumental activities of daily living. The rules adopted by the state department shall specify, in accordance with the provisions of this section, the services available under the program and shall specify eligibility criteria for the home care allowance program. In addition, the rules shall specifically provide for a determination as to the person's functional impairment and the person's unmet need for paid care and shall address amounts awarded to persons eligible for home care allowance. The state department shall specify in the rules the methods for determining the unmet need for paid care and the amount of a home care allowance that may be awarded to eligible persons. Such methods may be based on how often a person experiences unmet need for paid care or any other method that the state board determines is valid in correlating unmet need for paid care with an amount of a home care allowance award. The state department shall require that eligibility and unmet need for paid care be determined through the use of a comprehensive and uniform client assessment instrument prescribed by the state department. The state department may adjust income eligibility criteria, including any functional impairment standard, or the amounts awarded to eligible persons or may limit or suspend enrollments as necessary to manage the home care allowance program within the funds appropriated by the general assembly. In addition, the state department may adjust which services are available under the program; except that the adjustment shall be consistent with the provisions of this subsection (1).

The state department is authorized to implement pilot programs that it deems feasible to assess the overall impact, if any, of using alternatives to the method described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) for determining an eligible person's unmet need for paid care and the amount of a home care allowance awarded to an eligible person.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department shall administer the adult foster care program and the home care allowance program. The executive director or the state board, as appropriate, shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department shall administer the home care allowance program. The executive director or the state board, as appropriate, shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1304, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.)

Repealed.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department shall contract with the single entry point agencies for functions of the home care allowance and adult foster care programs pursuant to the terms of the contract or rule of the state department.

(5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department shall contract with case management agencies for functions of the home care allowance pursuant to the terms of the contract or rule of the state department.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1114, § 25, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1562, § 12, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, p. 2612, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 904, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 2001:

(1)(b) amended, p. 126, § 1, effective March 23.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1994, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 438, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1305, § 5, effective July 1; (1)(a)(I), (1)(b), and (3) amended, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1304, § 4, effective January 1, 2011; (1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 10-1146), ch. 281, p. 1305, § 6, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2013:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1811, § 50, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(1)(b)(III), (2), and (5) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 345, § 50, effective July 1, 2024; (1)(a)(III) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 345, 354, §§ 50, 70.

26-2-122.4. Home care allowance grant program - rules - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1177), ch. 45, p. 159, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 2017:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 17-1045), ch. 340, p. 1808, § 1, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of this section one year after the date that a consumer-directed service delivery option is available for homemaker, personal care, and medical support services for individuals who are receiving home-based and community-based services pursuant to the supported living services waiver. The revisor of statutes received a joint certification, in writing, from the executive directors of the state departments of human services and health care policy and financing stating that the consumer-directed delivery option became available on August 15, 2018, and requesting that the section repeal effective August 15, 2019.

26-2-122.5. Acceptance of available money to finance the low-income energy assistance program.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1234, § 22, effective July 1, 1997.)

The executive director of the state department, or said director's designee, is hereby authorized to accept any private contributions, including contributions from the fund created in section 40-8.5-104, C.R.S., and any federal grants, and to expend the same, subject to appropriation, for the purpose of increasing available funds under the low-income energy assistance program.

Notwithstanding the availability of additional money pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the low-income energy assistance program must be administered within the staffing structure, in existence on July 1, 1991, of the state department of human services and county departments of human or social services, without additional FTE.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1900, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 2704, § 263, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1234, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 447, § 118, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-2-123. Removal to another county.

Any recipient who becomes a resident of another county in this state shall be entitled to receive all forms of public assistance that are provided in the county to which the recipient transfers and for which he or she is eligible, and the county department of the county from which the recipient has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the county department of the county to which he or she has moved, pursuant to the rules of the state department.

The county to which a recipient moves is required to provide only those services and benefits under the Colorado works program created in part 7 of this article as are stipulated in the receiving county's performance contract.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1191, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-23.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1348, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1234, § 23, effective July 1.

26-2-124. Reconsideration and changes.

All assistance payments and social services provided under this article shall be reconsidered as frequently as and in the manner required by rules and regulations of the state department. After such further verification and record as the county department may deem necessary or the rules and regulations of the state department may require, the amount of assistance payments or the social services provided may be changed, or public assistance may be terminated, if the state department or the county department finds that the recipient's circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action or if changes in state or federal law have been made which would warrant such action.

In accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department, the county department may terminate public assistance at any time for cause, or it may, for cause, suspend public assistance for such period as it may deem proper. Timely notice to persons receiving public assistance, when in fact they are not eligible due to fraudulent acts, may be given five days before the date of a proposed action, in accordance with federal regulations.

Whenever assistance payments are terminated, suspended, or in any way changed, the county department shall at once report such decision to the recipient and to the state department setting forth the reason for such action. All such decisions shall be subject to review by the state department in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1191, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-24.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1335, § 5, effective July 15.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1120, § 1, effective April 29.

26-2-125. Colorado works cases - vendor payments.

The county department, upon reconsideration in cases involving the Colorado works program as provided in section 26-2-124, may authorize direct payment to vendors of the portion of the assistance grant budgeted for essential services and subsistence items for the children, if evidence has been accumulated that the relative payee is using that portion of the grant provided for the care, maintenance, and welfare of the children for other purposes.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1192, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-3-25.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1235, § 24, effective July 1.